Wisconsin, session 2025, AB429.
do enact as follows:AB429,13Section 1. 84.10478 of the statutes is created to read:AB429,2,2484.10478 Greg Quinn and Larry Millard Memorial Bridge. (1) The 5department shall designate and, subject to sub. (2), mark the overpass on I 39 over 6STH 82 in the town of Oxford in Marquette County as the “Greg Quinn and Larry 1Millard Memorial Bridge” in recognition and appreciation of the service of these 2two firefighters who lost their lives in the line of duty.AB429,2,93(2) Upon receipt of sufficient contributions from interested parties, including 4any county, city, village, or town, to cover the costs of erecting and maintaining 5markers at the overpass specified in sub. (1) to clearly identify to motorists the 6designation of the overpass as the “Greg Quinn and Larry Millard Memorial 7Bridge,” the department shall erect and maintain the markers. No state funds, 8other than from the receipt of contributions under this subsection, may be expended 9for the erection or maintenance of the markers.AB429,2,1010